Utah statutes.
16-6a-606.   Transfers.

(1)  Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, a member of a nonprofit corporation may not transfer:

(a)  a membership; or

(b)  any right arising from a membership.

(2)  Where transfer rights have been provided, a restriction on transfer rights may not be binding with respect to a member holding a membership issued prior to the adoption of the restriction, unless the restriction is approved by the affected member.



Enacted by Chapter 300, 2000 General Session

